Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.625

Graduate fellowship trust fund program—Name of fellowship—Duties of institution—Use of endowment proceeds.

(1) The fellowship is the property of the institution and may be named in honor of a donor, benefactor, or honoree of the institution, at the option of the institution.

(2) The institution is responsible for soliciting private donations, investing and maintaining all endowment funds, administering the fellowship, and reporting on the program to the governor and the legislature upon request. The institution may augment the endowment fund with additional private donations. The principal of the invested endowment fund shall not be invaded.

(3) The proceeds from the endowment fund may be used to provide fellowship stipends to be used by the recipient for such things as tuition and fees, subsistence, research expenses, and other educationally related costs.

[ 1987 c 147 s 6. Formerly RCW 28B.10.885.]